Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 2 Operating Procedures

Editor’s notes.

This article was designated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.

7-3-10.
False advertising prohibited.

No person shall advertise, display, distribute, or broadcast in any manner whatsoever any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for loans subject to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, § 12; Code 1933, § 25-312; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 14; Code 1981, §

7-3-13

; Code 1981, §

7-3-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-13 as present Code Section 7-3-10. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 7-3-10, concerning a license being required for each location, its display, duration, annual fees, and moving an office within the county, was repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. SB 462, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020. The former Code Section was based on Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 3450; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, §§ 7, 8, 9; Code 1933, §§ 25-205, 25-307, 25-308, 25-309; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 9; Ga. L. 1963, p. 370, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 288, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2725, § 2.

7-3-11.
Maximum loan amount, period, and charges; deferments.

Every authorized licensee location under this chapter may lend any sum of money not to exceed $3,000.00, with the term for any individual loan not to exceed a period of 36 months and 15 days or less and may charge, contract for, collect, and receive interest and fees and may require the fulfillment of conditions on such loans as provided in this Code section:

Interest. A licensee may charge, contract for, receive, and collect interest at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum of the face amount of the contract, whether repayable in one single payment or repayable in monthly or other periodic installments. On loan contracts repayable in 18 months or less, the interest may be discounted in advance; and, on contracts repayable over a greater period, the interest shall be added to the principal amount of the loan. On all contracts, interest or discount shall be computed proportionately on equal calendar months;

Loan fee. In addition thereto, a licensee may charge, contract for, receive, or collect at the time the loan is made a fee in an amount not greater than 8 percent of the first $600.00 of the face amount of the contract plus 4 percent of the excess; provided, however, that such fee shall not be charged or collected on that part of a loan which is used to pay or apply on a prior loan or installment of a prior loan from the same licensee to the same borrower made within the immediately preceding six-month period; provided, however, if the loan balance is $300.00 or less, the said period shall be two months, not six months; provided, further, that nothing contained in this paragraph and paragraph (1) of this Code section shall be construed to permit charges, interest, or fees of any nature whatsoever in the aggregate in excess of the charges, interest, and fees which would constitute a violation of Code Section 7-4-18 and this chapter shall in no way affect Code Section 7-4-18. If a borrower prepays his or her entire loan to a licensee and within the following 15 days obtains a new loan from that licensee and if this is done within the six-month period or the two-month period above described, as may be applicable, the fee may be charged only on the excess by which the face amount of the new contract exceeds the amount which the borrower repaid to that licensee within the said 15 day period;

Insurance premiums. A licensee may charge and collect from the borrower premiums actually paid or to be paid for insurance obtained for the borrower. A licensee may accept as security on any loan or advance made under this chapter any one or any combination of the following:

Insurance on tangible property against substantial risks or loss;

Reasonable insurance on the life and health of the principal party; or

Reasonable insurance against accident of the principal party;

provided, however, that any such insurance shall be reasonably related to the type and value of the property insured and to the amount and term of the loan and shall be obtained from an insurance company authorized to conduct such business in the State of Georgia and at rates lawfully filed by such company with the Commissioner of Insurance and through a regular insurance agent licensed by the Commissioner of Insurance; provided, further, that the amount of life, health, or accident insurance required as security for loans made under this chapter shall not exceed the amount of the loan, including charges, to be secured; and the premiums on such insurance required of the principal party obligated shall be limited to premiums reasonably based upon reliable actuarial experience and sound insurance practice; and the Commissioner of Insurance is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this provision related to insurance obtained by the borrower in accordance with the spirit and intent thereof. It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Insurance to determine and promulgate by rule and regulation the rates and maximum premiums permissible to be charged for life, health, and accident insurance required as security for a loan made under this chapter and to make regulations incident thereto necessary to effectuate the same; such premiums, when thus established and as changed from time to time in the manner aforesaid, shall be the maximum effective and permissible charges under this paragraph. Premiums paid or to be paid pursuant to the authority of this paragraph shall not constitute interest. The insurance company in turn may pay to the party writing the insurance policy sold in connection with the loan a fee or commission in an amount which is reasonable in relationship to the transaction and in no event in excess of the amount of fee or commission customarily paid within the industry where comparable insurance is sold in a transaction not involving credit, as determined by the Commissioner of Insurance;

Late charge. A licensee may charge and collect from the borrower a late or delinquent charge of $10.00 or an amount equal to 5¢ for each $1.00 of any installment which is not paid within five days from the date such payment is due, whichever is greater, provided that this late or delinquent charge shall not be collected more than once for the same default; and

Maintenance charge. In addition thereto, a licensee may contract for, charge, receive, and collect a maintenance charge of $3.00 for each month in the term of the loan contract on each loan made, whether repayable in one single payment or repayable in weekly, monthly, or other periodic installments. Refunds of unearned maintenance charges shall be made in accordance with the method prescribed in Code Section 7-3-14, and such maintenance charges will be subject to paragraph (4) of this Code section. Nothing contained in Code Section 7-4-18, as now or hereafter amended, shall be construed to apply to this paragraph; and loans made in conformity with this paragraph shall in no way constitute a violation of Code Section 7-4-18, as now or hereafter amended.

Deferment.

Hardship deferment: Nothing in this article shall be construed as prohibiting any licensee and borrower from contracting to defer periodic payments consisting of principal payments, interest, fees, premiums, and charges provided that no additional interest, fees, premiums, or charges are incurred or otherwise imposed as a result of such deferment. Nothing in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be construed as limiting the duration of a hardship deferment or the number of hardship deferments that can be granted during a loan term.

Convenience deferment: A licensee and a borrower may, at any time, contract to defer all of or part of one or more unpaid installments, and the licensee may make and collect a charge therefor, subject to the following provisions:

A convenience deferment may be for any duration agreed upon by the licensee and the borrower but shall not exceed four months. A licensee may agree to multiple convenience deferments during the loan term provided that the total duration of all convenience deferments does not exceed four months;

A licensee may charge a fee for the deferment. The deferment fee shall not exceed an amount equal to the result of applying the interest rate provided in the original loan agreement to the amount deferred for the deferment period. The deferment fee shall be calculated without regard to the difference in lengths of months by counting each day of the deferment period as one-thirtieth of a month. The fee may be collected at the time it is assessed or at any later date as agreed upon by the licensee and the borrower; provided, however, that the deferment fee is earned pro rata during the deferment period and is fully earned on the last day of the deferment period;

A licensee shall not charge any fees, premiums, interest, or charges other than the deferment fee for the duration of the deferment period and such fees, premiums, interest, or charges other than the deferment fee shall not accrue during the deferment period;

If a licensee renews or refinances an installment loan within three months after the end of the convenience deferment period, the licensee must refund or credit the entire convenience deferment fee to the borrower;

If a licensee enters into a convenience deferment agreement with a borrower and the licensee enters into a hardship deferment agreement with the borrower within three months of the end of the convenience deferment period, the licensee must refund or credit the entire convenience deferment fee to the borrower; and

If a loan is prepaid during a deferment period, the licensee shall refund or credit to the borrower any unearned portion of the deferment fee as calculated pursuant to division (ii) of this subparagraph in addition to any other refund or credit due to the borrower for prepayment.

Any deferment agreement shall be evidenced in writing and shall include:

The amount or amounts deferred;

The length of the deferment period, including the due date for the borrower’s next payment;

The amount of the deferment fee, if applicable; and

Where any credit insurance or ancillary product with a specific term was purchased by the borrower, the following disclosure to the borrower: “You have purchased a credit insurance product(s) and/or [identify the specific ancillary product ] in connection with this loan. The deferment agreed to herein will not extend the term of coverage of those products.”

Whenever a licensee enters into a deferment agreement with the borrower hereunder, the deferment shall not be considered to be an improper extension of the loan term, and the original loan term shall be extended by the period deferred. For purposes of granting a deferment, licensees may extend the term of the loan beyond the maximum term limit of 36 months and 15 days.

A licensee shall not offer or require a borrower to obtain credit insurance or any other ancillary product for the extension of the original loan term due to a deferment.

After the conclusion of a deferment period, the borrower shall resume payments in the same amounts and intervals as set forth in the original loan agreement. Licensees shall not require borrowers to make a lump sum repayment.

Licensees shall maintain a monthly journal of loans that were deferred by identifying the specific borrower that entered into the deferment agreement, the type of deferment granted, and the status of such deferment.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, §§ 10, 12; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3458, 3459, 3461; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, §§ 13, 14; Code 1933, §§ 25-213, 25-214, 25-216, 25-301, 25-313, 25-315, 25-317; Ga. L. 1935, p. 394, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 15; Ga. L. 1964, p. 288, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 393, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 288, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 509, §§ 1, 3; Code 1981, §

7-3-14

; Ga. L. 1981, p. 621, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 205, § 1; Code 1981, §

7-3-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 37/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 39/HB 891.

The first 2020 amendment, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated Code Section 7-3-14 as present Code Section 7-3-11, and substituted “lend” for “loan” near the beginning of the introductory paragraph; in the last sentence of paragraph (2), substituted “obtains” for “makes” and “from” for “with; rewrote the ending undesignated paragraph of paragraph (3), which read: “provided, however, that any such insurance shall be reasonably related to the type and value of the property insured and to the amount and term of the loan and shall be obtained from an insurance company authorized to conduct such business in the State of Georgia and at rates lawfully filed by such company with the Commissioner of Insurance and through a regular insurance agent licensed by the Commissioner of Insurance; provided, further, the amount of life, health, or accident insurance required as security for loans made under this chapter shall not exceed the amount of the loan, including charges, to be secured; and the premiums on such insurance required of the principal party obligated shall be limited to premiums reasonably based upon reliable actuarial experience and sound insurance practice; and the Commissioner is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this provision in accordance with the spirit and intent thereof. It shall be the duty of the Commissioner from time to time under the foregoing direction, after public hearing in the manner provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-3-7, to determine and promulgate the rates and maximum premiums permissible to be charged for life, health, and accident insurance required as security for a loan made under this chapter and to make regulations incident thereto necessary to effectuate the same; such premiums, when thus established and as changed from time to time in the manner aforesaid, shall be the maximum effective and permissible charges under this paragraph. Premiums paid or to be paid pursuant to the authority of this paragraph shall not constitute interest. The insurance company in turn may pay to the party writing the insurance policy sold in connection with the loan a fee or commission in an amount which is reasonable in relationship to the transaction and in no event in excess of the amount of fee or commission customarily paid within the industry where comparable insurance is sold in a transaction not involving credit, as determined by the Commissioner;”; and substituted “Code Section 7-3-14” for “Code Section 7-3-17” in the second sentence of paragraph (5). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, further, that the amount” for “provided, further, the amount” at the beginning of the second proviso of the undesignated ending paragraph in paragraph (3). See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added paragraph (6).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “authorized” and “location” and substituted “to exceed $3,000.00, with the term for any individual loan not to exceed” for “exceeding $3,000.00 for” in the introductory language of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 7-3-11, concerning failure to begin business or suspending activities after license issued, was repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1964, p. 288, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7.

Law reviews.

For article, “Acceleration Clauses in Georgia: Consumer Installment Contracts and the Federal Truth-In-Lending Act,” see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 969 (1976).

For article discussing methods of computation of finance charges in Georgia consumer credit contracts, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1978).

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-3-12.
Limitation on further charges.

No licensee shall charge, contract for, or receive any other or further amount in connection with any loans authorized by this chapter in addition to those provided in Code Section 7-3-11, except the actual lawful fees paid to a public official or agency of the state for filing, recording, or, on loans over $100.00, the amount of the lawful premiums, no greater than such fees, actually paid for insurance against the risk of nonrecording or releasing any instrument securing the loan; the court costs and attorney fees authorized by law incurred in the collection of any contract in default; and the actual and reasonable expenses of repossessing, storing, and selling any collateral pledged as security for any contract in default. No licensee shall divide into separate parts any contract for the purpose or with the effect of obtaining charges in excess of those authorized by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, §§ 10, 12; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3459, 3461; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, § 13; Code 1933, §§ 25-214, 25-216, 25-313, 25-316; Ga. L. 1935, p. 394, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 16; Code 1981, §

7-3-15

; Code 1981, §

7-3-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-15 as present Code Section 7-3-12, and substituted “Code Section 7-3-11” for “Code Section 7-3-14”. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 7-3-12, concerning books, records, and reports, was repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.
The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, § 6; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3454, 3455; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, § 11; Code 1933, §§ 25-209, 25-210, 25-310; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7.

7-3-13.
Licensee’s compliance when purchasing notes and other documents.

If a licensee purchases or receives by transfer or assignment any note, bill of sale to secure debt, title retention contract, conditional sales contract, or any other similar contract that would otherwise be governed by this chapter, the licensee shall comply with the provisions of this chapter when making a loan for the purpose of paying off all or any part of such instrument.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 288, § 7; Code 1981, §

7-3-16

; Code 1981, §

7-3-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-16 as present Code Section 7-3-13, and substituted “If a licensee purchases or receives by transfer or assignment” for “No loan shall be made by any licensee for the purpose of paying all or any part of the amount owed on” and “that would otherwise be governed by this chapter, the licensee shall comply with the provisions of this chapter when making a loan for the purpose of paying off all or any part of such instrument” for “which has been purchased by or assigned or transferred to such licensee for a period of at least 90 days from the date of such purchase or transfer”. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-13 as present Code Section 7-3-10.

7-3-14.
Payment before maturity; refund of prepaid interest; continuing insurance.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, a borrower may at any time prepay all or any part of the unpaid balance to become payable under any installment loan. If the borrower prepays the loan in full before maturity, the licensee shall refund to the borrower a portion of the prepaid interest, calculated in complete even months (odd days omitted), as follows: the amount of the refund shall represent at least as great a proportion of the total interest as the sum of the periodical time balance after the date of prepayment bears to the sum of all periodical time balances under the schedule of payments in the original contract. Where the amount of the refund due to anticipation of payment is less than $1.00, no refund need be made. If the borrower has been required to purchase insurance coverage other than insurance coverage in a blanket policy when the borrower has paid no acquisition cost, the borrower shall have the option to continue such insurance in force for the balance of the policy period, with all rights transferred to the borrower or his or her assigns, in which event no refund of insurance premiums shall be made.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 17; Code 1981, §

7-3-17

; Code 1981, §

7-3-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-17 as present Code Section 7-3-14, and in the first sentence, substituted “loan” for “contract”; in the second sentence, substituted “prepays the loan” for “pays the time balance”, “the borrower” for “him”, and “the amount” for “The amount”; and, in the fourth sentence, inserted “insurance coverage”, substituted “the borrower” for “he” twice, substituted “his or her” for “his”, and deleted “to him” following “made” at the end. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-14 as present Code Section 7-3-11.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of computation of finance charges in Georgia consumer credit contracts, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1978).

7-3-15.
Delivery of copy of contract or itemized statement; receipts.

In addition to any applicable disclosure requirements, at the time the installment loan is made, each licensee under this chapter shall deliver to the borrower or, if there are multiple borrowers, to one of the borrowers a copy of the loan contract or a written itemized statement in the English language showing in clear terms the date and amount of the loan, a schedule of the payments or a description thereof, the type of security for the loan, the licensee’s name, unique identifier, business address, the actual amount of cash advanced to or on behalf of the borrower, the amount of each class of insurance carried and the premiums paid thereon, and the amount of interest and fees. Each licensee shall give a receipt for every cash payment made.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, §§ 6, 7; Civil Code 1910, § 3454; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, § 14; Code 1933, §§ 25-209, 25-314; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 19; Code 1981, §

7-3-18

; Code 1981, §

7-3-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-18 as present Code Section 7-3-15, and, in the first sentence, substituted “In addition to any applicable disclosure requirements, at the time the installment” for “At the time the”, “multiple borrowers” for “two or more”, “the borrowers” for “them”, and substituted “, unique identifier, business address, the actual amount of cash” for “and address, the actual cash”. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-15 as present Code Section 7-3-12.

7-3-16.
Additional loan fees; interest; penalties.

On and after July 1, 2022, in addition to all other fees, license fees, fines, or other charges now or hereafter levied or assessed, there is imposed on each loan made pursuant to this chapter a fee of 0.125 percent of the gross loan amount. Such per loan fee shall become due on the making of any such loan, including, but not limited to, the closing of a loan, the renewal or refinancing of a loan, or a modification of a loan which results in the execution of a new or amended loan agreement.

Such per loan fee is levied and assessed against the person so licensed and shall be paid by such person and shall not be added in any manner as an additional fee or charge against the borrower. Such per loan fee shall be remitted to the department at the time and in the manner specified by rules and regulations of the department.

In the event any person fails or refuses to remit the fees required by this Code section within the time prescribed, the fees shall bear interest at the rate of 1 percent per month. Interest shall begin to accrue from the date the fees are due until the date the fees are paid. For purposes of this Code section, any period of less than one month shall be considered to be one month.

In the event any person fails or refuses to remit the per loan fees required by this Code section within the time prescribed, there shall be added to the fees a penalty equivalent to 25 percent of the fees due, but in no case shall the penalty so added be less than $5.00. In the event any person fraudulently remits the incorrect fees, there shall be added to the fees a penalty equivalent to 50 percent of the fees due, but in no case shall the penalty so added be less than $5.00.

The 2022 revisions of Code Sections 7-3-16, 7-3-17, and 7-3-18 shall not affect the fees, taxes, and related interest and penalties owed pursuant to the earlier versions of such Code sections for any time prior to July 1, 2022.

The department and its authorized examiners and employees shall have the right to inspect all records of any person licensed pursuant to this chapter, and the department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relative to the enforcement of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 40/HB 891; Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 57, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 86, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Code 1981, §

7-3-19

; Code 1981, §

7-3-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, “July 1, 2022” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act” at the end of subsection (e).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, “per loan fees” was substituted for “per loans fees” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-16 as present Code Section 7-3-13.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 40/HB 891, repealed former Code Section

7-3-16

, relating to tax on interest, levy, and penalty for tax to charges, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 57, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 86, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Code 1981, §

7-3-19

; Code 1981, §

7-3-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

7-3-17.
[Reserved] Tax on interest — Payment; inspection of records; rules and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 57, § 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 86, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1247, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7; Code 1981, §

7-3-20

; Code 1981, §

7-3-17

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; repealed by Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 41/HB 891, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-17 as present Code Section 7-3-14.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 41/HB 891 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2022.

7-3-18.
[Reserved] Tax on interest — Penalties for late or fraudulent tax payments.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 57, § 3; Code 1981, §

7-3-21

; Code 1981, §

7-3-18

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; repealed by Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 42/HB 891, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-18 as present Code Section 7-3-15.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 42/HB 891 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2022.

7-3-19.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-19 as former Code Section 7-3-16.